Massachusetts, session 194th, H3649.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 1 of chapter 90 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the definition of “Automobile transporter”
the following 2 definitions:-
“Autonomous technology,” technology installed on a motor vehicle that has the
capability to control the motor vehicle on which the technology is installed, without the active
control or monitoring by a human operator; provided, however, that “autonomous technology”
shall not include active safety or driver assistance technology, including, electronic blind spot
assistance, crash avoidance, emergency braking, parking assistance, adaptive cruise control, lane
keep assistance, lane departure warning, or traffic jam and queuing assistant, unless any of the
of 2

technology, alone or in combination with other technology, enables the motor vehicle on which
the technology is installed to drive without the active control or monitoring by a human operator.
“Autonomous vehicle,” any motor vehicle equipped with autonomous technology.
SECTION 2. Said section 1 of said chapter 90, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by inserting after the definition of “Way” the following definition:-
“Zero emission vehicle”, a battery electric vehicle, a plug-in hybrid electric vehicle or a
fuel cell vehicle.
SECTION 3. Said chapter 90 is hereby further amended by inserting after section 19L the
following section:-
Section 19M. An autonomous vehicle operated on the ways of the commonwealth shall
be a zero emission vehicle.
of 2